North Carolina, session 2025, HB763.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. NEIGHBORING STATE LICENSURE RECOGNITION
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 93B of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 93B-15.3. Licensure recognition for individuals licensed in neighboring states.
(a) Applicability. – This section applies to all occupational licensing boards and State
agency licensing boards except as provided in this subsection. This section shall not apply to:
(1) Licensure of any healthcare practitioner licensed under Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes.
(2) Architects licensed under Chapter 83A of the General Statutes.
(3) Certified public accountants licensed under Chapter 93 of the General
Statutes.
(4) Engineers licensed under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes.
(5) Veterinarians licensed, or veterinary technicians registered, under Article 11
of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(6) Admission to the practice of law or licensure as an attorney under Chapter 84
of the General Statutes.
(7) Licensure of any practitioner licensed by the North Carolina Pesticide Board
under Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
(8) Licensure of any practitioner licensed by the North Carolina Structural Pest
Control Committee under Article 4C of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.
(9) Dealers, salesmen, issuers, investment advisors, investment advisor
representatives, and athlete agents under Chapters 78A, 78C, and 78D of the
General Statutes.
(10) Certification of any practitioner by the North Carolina On-Site Wastewater
Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board under Article 5 of Chapter 90A
of the General Statutes.
(11) Licensure of any new motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, motor
vehicle sales representative, manufacturer, factory branch, factory
representative, distributor, distributor branch, distributor representative, or
wholesaler under Article 12 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.
(b) Licensure Recognition. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
occupational licensing board or a State agency licensing board subject to this section shall issue
a license, certification, or registration to any applicant who establishes residence in this State and
satisfies all of the following conditions:
(1) The applicant is currently licensed, certified, or registered in Georgia, South
Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, or West Virginia in the discipline applied for
*H763-v-6*

in this State at the same or substantially equivalent practice level, as
determined by the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing
board.
(2) The applicant has been licensed, certified, or registered in one or more of the
states listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection for at least one year.
(3) The applicant has passed an examination required for the license, certification,
or registration in the jurisdiction in which the applicant holds a current license,
certification, or registration, if an examination was required.
(4) The applicant is in good standing in all jurisdictions within the United States
in which the applicant holds or has ever held a license, certification, or
registration in the profession for which the applicant is seeking licensure,
certification, or registration in this State.
(5) The applicant has not voluntarily surrendered a license, certification, or
registration or had a license, certification, or registration revoked in any
jurisdiction within the United States as a result of unprofessional conduct
related to the profession for which the applicant is seeking licensure,
certification, or registration in this State.
(6) The applicant demonstrates competency in the profession through methods
determined by the board, which may include having met the minimum
education, clinical supervision, or work experience requirements in effect in
the originating state at the time the applicant obtained the license, certification,
or registration from that state.
(7) The applicant does not have any active or pending disciplinary actions from
an occupational licensing board or agency in another jurisdiction within the
United States and, if applicable, the occupational licensing board or State
agency licensing board has completed verification under subsection (c) of this
section.
(8) The applicant does not have a disqualifying criminal history record, as
determined by the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing
board under G.S. 93B-8.1 and related provisions of law.
(9) The applicant has paid all applicable fees, including fees for application
processing, license issuance, verification of credentials, and background
checks.
(c) Prior Disciplinary Actions. – If the applicant has any prior resolved disciplinary
actions from an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board at the time of
application, the occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board to which the
applicant is applying shall determine and verify that the disciplinary action is resolved and, if
applicable, corrective action has been taken. If a disciplinary action is pending in another
jurisdiction, an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall suspend the
application process for any license, certificate, or registration under this section until the
disciplinary action has been resolved.
(d) Required Information. – Each occupational licensing board or State agency licensing
board shall publish a document that lists the specific criteria or requirements for licensure,
certification, or registration by the board under this section and any necessary documentation
needed for satisfying the requirements. The information required by this subsection shall be
published on the occupational licensing board's or State agency licensing board's website.
(e) Effect on Other Agreements. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent
any occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in this State from entering into
a reciprocity agreement with another jurisdiction or to invalidate any existing reciprocity
agreement between any occupational licensing board or agency in this State and another
jurisdiction.
Page 2 House Bill 763-Ratified

(f) Scope of License. – Any license, certification, or registration granted by an
occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board to any applicant under this section
shall be valid only in this State and does not extend validity to other jurisdictions, including
through an interstate compact, unless otherwise provided by law or interstate agreement.
(g) Rights and Obligations. – Any individual who is licensed, certified, or registered
under this section shall be entitled to the same rights and subject to the same obligations as
required of an individual who was licensed, certified, or registered by an occupational licensing
board or State agency licensing board in this State under any other provision of law.
(h) Alternative Pathway. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
individual from proceeding under the existing licensure, certification, or registration
requirements established by an occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board in
this State."
SECTION 1.(b) Report. – Beginning on October 31, 2026, each occupational
licensing board and State agency licensing board subject to G.S. 93B-15.3, as enacted by this
section, shall include all of the following data for the previous fiscal year in the annual report to
the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure
Oversight Committee, as required by G.S. 93B-2:
(1) The number of individuals who applied for licensure, certification, or
registration in accordance with G.S. 93B-15.3.
(2) The number of individuals who received licensure, certification, or
registration in accordance with G.S. 93B-15.3.
(3) The number of individuals who were denied licensure, certification, or
registration in accordance with G.S. 93B-15.3, including the reasons for
denial.
SECTION 2. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and
applies to applications for licensure, certification, or registration received on or after that date.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
House Bill 763-Ratified Page 3